InanimAaNoun.lexc
!!!nouns.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +Anim +Inanim +Indef +Nom +Acc +Dat +GenLoc +InstrAbl +Voc +Sg +Pl +Indef ^GUESSSTEMA ^GUESSSTEMAA ^GUESSSTEMC

LEXICON Root
InanimAaStem;

LEXICON InanimAaStem

ගෙදර InanimAaNoun;
ඇද InanimAaNoun;
බද InanimAaNoun;
වසර InanimAaNoun;
පෙළ InanimAaNoun;
රට InanimAaNoun;
ඉඩ InanimAaNoun;
ජය InanimAaNoun;
පහර InanimAaNoun;
වැඩපිළිවෙළ InanimAaNoun;
හෙට InanimAaNoun;
පිළිවෙළ InanimAaNoun;

LEXICON InanimAaNoun
+N+Acc+Sg+Inanim:#;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ට #;
+N+Dat+Indef+Sg:ටම #;
+N+GenLoc+Indef+Sg:ක #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Anim:කට #;
+N+InstrAbl+Sg+Inanim:ින් #;
+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:ේ #;
+N+Voc+Sg+Anim:ේදී #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Anim:ේත් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:ක් #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:ම #;
+N+Nom+Indef+Sg:ත් #;
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වල #;
+N+Dat+Pl+Inanim:වලට#
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වලින් #
+N+InstrAbl+Pl+Inanim:වල්වලින් #;
+N+GenLoc+Sg+Inanim:වල්වල #;
